Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 42

Sanctuary Policies Prohibited

4-42-101. Compliance with federal immigration laws.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that:

Because the matters contained in this chapter have important statewide ramifications for compliance with and enforcement of federal immigration laws and for the welfare of all citizens in this state, these matters are of statewide concern;

Allowing illegal immigrants to reside within this state undermines federal immigration laws and state laws allocating available resources; and

The attorney general and reporter and all appropriate state law enforcement agencies are to vigorously pursue all federal moneys to which the state may be entitled for the reimbursement of moneys spent to comply with federal immigration laws.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 enacted a new chapter 59, §§4-59-101 —4-59-104; however, the enactment by Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 was designated as chapter 42, §§4-42-101 —4-42-104 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 (a) The act, which enacted this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) In complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.

4-42-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Law enforcement agency”:

Means an agency in this state charged with enforcement of state or federal laws, or with managing custody of detained persons in this state, and includes, but is not limited to, state police, campus police, and the department of safety; and

Includes officials, representatives, agents, and employees of an agency described in subdivision (1)(A);

“Official” means an agent, employee, member, or representative of a state governmental entity, but does not mean the attorney general and reporter;

“Sanctuary policy” means any directive, order, ordinance, resolution, practice, or policy, whether formally enacted, informally adopted, or otherwise effectuated, that:

Limits or prohibits any state governmental entity or official from communicating or cooperating with federal agencies or officials to verify or report the immigration status of any alien;

Grants to aliens unlawfully present in the United States the right to lawful presence within the boundaries of this state in violation of federal law;

Violates 8 U.S.C. § 1373;

Restricts in any way, or imposes any conditions on, a state or local governmental entity's cooperation or compliance with detainers from the United States department of homeland security, or other successor agency, to maintain custody of any alien or to transfer any alien to the custody of the United States department of homeland security, or other successor agency;

Requires the United States department of homeland security, or other successor agency, to obtain a warrant or demonstrate probable cause before complying with detainers from the department to maintain custody of any alien or to transfer any alien to its custody; or

Prevents law enforcement agencies from inquiring as to the citizenship or immigration status of any person; and

“State governmental entity” means any state agency, bureau, commission, council, department, law enforcement agency, or unit thereof, but does not mean the office of the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 enacted a new chapter 59, §§4-59-101 —4-59-104; however, the enactment by Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 was designated as chapter 42, §§4-42-101 —4-42-104 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 (a) The act, which enacted this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) In complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.

4-42-103. Enactment of sanctuary policy prohibited.

No state governmental entity or official shall adopt or enact a sanctuary policy. A state governmental entity that adopts or enacts a sanctuary policy is ineligible to enter into any grant contract with the department of economic and community development until the sanctuary policy is repealed, rescinded, or otherwise no longer in effect.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 enacted a new chapter 59, §§4-59-101 —4-59-104; however, the enactment by Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 was designated as chapter 42, §§4-42-101 —4-42-104 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 (a) The act, which enacted this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) In complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.

4-42-104. Complaint — Injunction — Time for compliance — Violation.

A person residing in a municipality or county who believes a state governmental entity or official has violated § 4-42-103 may file a complaint in chancery court in that person's county of residence.

The person filing the complaint has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a violation of § 4-42-103 has occurred.

If the court finds the state governmental entity or official is in violation of § 4-42-103, the court shall issue a writ of mandamus against the entity or official ordering the entity or official to comply with § 4-42-103, enjoin the entity or official from further interference, and take other action to ensure compliance as is within the jurisdiction of the court.

A state governmental entity or official has no less than one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of the court's order to comply with the order. If, after one hundred twenty (120) days, the entity or official has not complied with the court's order, the court may take whatever action necessary to enforce compliance.

Upon a finding by the court that a state governmental entity or official has adopted or enacted a sanctuary policy, the state governmental entity, or the entity to which the official belongs, becomes ineligible to enter into any grant contract with the department of economic and community development. Ineligibility commences on the date the court finds that the state governmental entity or official is in violation of § 4-42-103 and continues until such time that the court certifies that the sanctuary policy is repealed, rescinded, or otherwise no longer in effect.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 enacted a new chapter 59, §§4-59-101 —4-59-104; however, the enactment by Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 1 was designated as chapter 42, §§4-42-101 —4-42-104 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 (a) The act, which enacted this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) In complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.